Utah statutes.
59-8-104.   Rate -- Change of rate.
(1)  Beginning on or after July 1, 2006, and subject to Section 11-13-303, an
in lieu excise tax is imposed on the gross receipts of a taxpayer engaging in
business in the state of Utah in each taxable year as follows:
Gross Receipts Amount                           Rate of Tax
Not in excess of $10,000,000                                         None
In excess of $10,000,000 but not
    in excess of $500,000,000                                   .6250%
In excess of $500,000,000 but not
    in excess of $1,000,000,000                         .9375%
In excess of $1,000,000,000                                     1.2500%
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that, as a result of the tax rate
decrease provided in Section 59-8-104 of Chapter 221, Laws of Utah 2006, all
or a portion of any cost decrease received by a taxpayer as a result of the
tax rate decrease be used in whole or in part for expenditures, scholarships,
or grants that will benefit the citizens of this state.
